Washington statutes.
RCW 19.144.040

Prepayment penalty or fee—Limitation.

A financial institution may not make or facilitate the origination of a residential mortgage loan that includes a prepayment penalty or fee that extends beyond sixty days prior to the initial reset period of an adjustable rate mortgage.

[ 2008 c 108 s 5.]